Mississippi statutes. Title 53. Oil, Gas, and Other Minerals
Chapter 11. Mississippi Geologic Sequestration of Carbon Dioxide Act
§ 53-11-25.
Cessation of storage operations.

After cessation of injection into a geologic sequestration facility and upon application by the storage operator, the board shall be authorized to issue a certificate of completion of injection operations upon a showing by the storage operator that the reservoir is reasonably expected to retain mechanical integrity, and that carbon dioxide will reasonably remain emplaced.

Nothing in this chapter shall establish or create any liability or responsibility on the part of the board or the state to pay any costs associated with facility restoration from any source other than the performance bond, deposit, other assurance of performance, or financial assurances posted or required pursuant to this chapter, nor shall the board or the state have any liability or responsibility to make any payments for costs associated with facility restoration.

The board or its agents, on proper identification, may enter the land of another for purposes of facility assessment or restoration.

The board and its agents are not liable for any damages arising from an act or omission if the act or omission is part of a good faith effort to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

No party contracting with the state or any of its political subdivisions under the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to be a public employee or agent of the State of Mississippi or any of its political subdivisions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 437, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2011.).

§ 53-11-27.
Release of performance bond, deposit, or other assurance of performance.

The storage operator may file an application with the board for the release of the performance bond, deposit or other assurance of performance on or after the third anniversary of the date the board issued a certificate of completion for the geologic sequestration facility. An application for a release shall require a description of the status of the carbon dioxide plume development or migration compared to models previously provided to the board, and any other information the board may reasonably require in accordance with this chapter. The board shall give notice of the pending release application by publication as provided in Section 53-3-115.

Before the board’s release of all or any portion of a storage operator’s performance bond, deposit or other assurance of performance, the board shall require that the storage operator satisfy, in the reasonable determination of the board, the financial assurance requirements of the federal Safe Drinking Water Act and regulations promulgated thereunder. If the financial assurance has as any component a trust or standby trust, the board and the state shall be named as trust beneficiaries. The trust situs shall be located in the state, and at least one (1) trustee shall be a legal resident of the state.

The board may release, in whole or in part, the performance bond, deposit or other assurance of performance if it is satisfied that plume migration has stabilized or is developing in the manner anticipated in models previously filed with the board and the geologic sequestration facility has met all necessary mechanical integrity requirements.

When the storage operator has successfully completed any necessary remedial actions required by the board, but not more than two (2) years beyond the date of the board’s initial, partial release of the performance bond, deposit or other assurance of performance, the board shall release the remaining portion of the performance bond, deposit or other assurance of performance. However, no performance bond, deposit or other assurance of performance shall be fully released until all requirements of this chapter are fully met.

If the board denies the application for release of the performance bond, deposit or other assurance of performance or portion thereof, it shall notify the storage operator, in writing, stating the reasons for denial and recommending corrective actions necessary to secure the release.

Full release by the board of the performance bond, deposit or other assurance of performance of the storage operator or any other party holding title to the stored carbon dioxide, shall not affect, either to enlarge or diminish in any way, any legal obligations of the owner of the carbon dioxide or an owner or operator of any carbon dioxide sequestration facility resulting from the actions authorized pursuant to this chapter.

Substantial compliance with this chapter shall in no way be construed to be an absolute defense to civil liability.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 437, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2011.).

§ 53-11-29.
Refusing to monitor or producing false or inaccurate readings.

It shall be a violation of this chapter for any person to refuse to attach or install a monitor within a reasonable period of time when ordered to do so by the board, or in any way to tamper with the monitors so as to produce a false or inaccurate reading.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 437, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2011.).

§ 53-11-31.
Appeal to chancery court.

Any interested person adversely affected by any provision or section of this chapter within the jurisdiction of the board or by any rule, regulation or order made by the board thereunder, or by any act done or threatened thereunder, may obtain court review and seek relief by appeal to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, or the chancery court of the county in which the land involved, or any part thereof, is situated. The term “interested person” shall be interpreted broadly and liberally and shall include all mineral and royalty owners, mineral lessees, if any, and the owners of surface on which injection or re-injection wells and other surface equipment connected with a geologic sequestration facility is or will be situated. Any interested party may appeal to the chancery court of the county in which the land involved or any part thereof is situated, if appeal is demanded within thirty (30) days from the date that the rule, regulation or order of the board is filed for record in the office of the board.

The appeal may be taken by filing notice of the appeal with the board, whereupon the board shall, under its certificate, transmit to the court appealed to all documents and papers on file in the matter, together with a transcript of the record, which documents and papers together with said transcript of the record shall be transmitted to the clerk of the chancery court of the county to which the appeal is taken.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the appeal otherwise shall be made in accordance with the provisions of Sections 53-1-39 and 53-1-41.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 437, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2011.).

§ 53-11-33.
No effect upon enhanced oil or gas recovery operations.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this chapter, nothing in this chapter shall prevent an enhanced oil or gas recovery project utilizing injection of carbon dioxide as approved by the board under Section 53-1-17 or require compliance with all or part of this chapter by any enhanced oil or gas recovery project that is not a geologic sequestration facility. An operator of an enhanced oil or gas recovery project utilizing injection of carbon dioxide may request that the board approve such a project as a geologic sequestration facility under this chapter or that the board determine that injection activities constitute the sequestration of carbon dioxide, but nothing in this chapter shall require that such a request be made. No provision of this chapter shall affect or govern any aspect of an enhanced oil or gas recovery project utilizing injection of carbon dioxide unless and until the operator of such project has requested that a particular project be approved by the board as a geologic sequestration facility and the board has granted that request.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 437, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 23, 2011.).